Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.650

Health carrier data.

(1) Any data submitted by health carriers to the health benefit exchange for purposes of establishing standardized health plans under RCW 43.71.095 are exempt from disclosure under this chapter. This subsection applies to health carrier data in the custody of the insurance commissioner for purposes of consulting with the health benefit exchange under RCW 43.71.095(1).

(2) Any data submitted by health carriers to the health care authority for purposes of RCW 41.05.410 are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 364 s 2.]